Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB599.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2720. Masked intimidation.(a) Offense defined.--A pers on commits the offense of masked intimidation if the person, while wearing a facial covering, intentionally harasses, intimidates or threatens another individual or a group of individuals with the intent of placing the other individual or group of individuals in reasonable fear for their physical safety.(b) Grading.--An offense under this section shall be classified as a misdemeanor of the third degree.(c) Applicability.--This section does not apply to a person who, without any intent specified in subsection (a), wears a 123456789101112131415161718 facial covering:(1) as part of a costume of the person, on or near the occasion of a holiday, celebration or other event involving costumes;(2) to ensure the physical safety of the person;(3) because of the nature of the occupation, trade or profession of the person;(4) to protect the person from the weather elements or while participating in a winter sport;(5) as part of an artistic or theatrical production or celebration;(6) to protect the person during an emergency situation or emergency management drill or related event, as in the case of wearing a gas mask or other protective facial covering;(7) to ensure the physical health and safety of the person or the health and safety of other individuals, including to limit the spread of an airborne illness; or(8) as a garb for religious purposes.(d) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish or infringe upon any right protected under the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Facial covering." A mask, device, hood or other article that covers, hides or otherwise conceals the face or identity of an individual."Harass." To engage in a knowing and willful pattern of conduct directed at a particular individual or group of 20250HB0599PN0607 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individuals that is intended to cause the individual or group of individuals to reasonably fear for their safety or suffer substantial emotional distress."Intimidate." To willfully and substantially interfere with, by threat, intimidation or coercion, the exercise or enjoyment by another individual or a group of individuals of rights secured by the Constitution of the United States, the Constitution of Pennsylvania or by Federal or State law, because of the actual or perceived race, color, religion, national origin, ethnicity, sex, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation or disability of the other individual or group of individuals."Threaten." To communicate a clear intention to cause imminent bodily harm to another individual or a group of individuals.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0599PN0607 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516